sv: Konststil: Art déco; Art nouveau; Belysande; Retro/Vintage; Typografi; Övrigt
es: Estilo artístico: Art deco; Art nouveau; Ilustrativo; Retro/Vintage; Tipografía; Otros
el: Τεχνοτροπία: Αρ ντεκό; Αρ νουβό; Τέχνη της εικονογράφησης; Ρετρό/Βίντατζ; Τυπογραφία; Άλλο
tr: Sanat Stili: Sanatsal dekorasyon; Art nouveau; Tasvir edici; Retro/Vintage; Tipografi; Diğer
zh-TW: 藝術樣式: 裝飾藝術; 新藝術; 解說性的; 復古/復古; 排版; 其他
th: สไตล์ศิลปะ: อาร์ตเดโค; อาร์ตนูโว; ภาพประกอบการเล่าเรื่อง; เรโทร/วินเทจ; อักษรศิลป์; อื่นๆ
fi: Taidetyyli: Art deco; Art nouveau; Havainnollistava; Retro/Vintage; Typografia; Muu
zh-CN: 艺术风格: 装饰艺术; 新艺术风格; 插画; 复古/复古; 排版; 其他
sl-SI: Umetniški slog: Art deco; Art nouveau; Ilustrativno; Retro/vintage; Tipografija; Drugo
pt-BR: Estilo de arte: Art deco; Art nouveau; Ilustrativo; Retrô/Vintage; Tipografia; Outro
nl: Kunststijl: Art-deco; Art Nouveau; Illustratief; Retro/Vintage; Typografie; Andere
pt-PT: Estilo de arte: Art Deco; Art Nouveau; Ilustrativo; Retro/vintage; Tipografia; Outro
hr-HR: Umjetnički stil: Art déco; Secesija; Ilustracija; Retro/vintage; Tipografija; Ostalo
bg-BG: Художествен стил: Арт Деко; Арт нуво; Илюстративен; Ретро/винтидж; Типография; Други
en: Art style: Art deco; Art nouveau; Illustrative; Retro/Vintage; Typography; Other
pl: Styl artystyczny: Art déco; Secesja; Ilustracyjny; Retro/Vintage; Typografia; Inne
ko: 아트 스타일: 아르 데코; 아르 누보; 예시; 레트로/빈티지; 타이포그래피; 기타
fr: Style artistique: Art Déco; Art Nouveau; Illustration; Rétro/Vintage; Typographie; Autre
ja: アートスタイル: アールデコ; アールヌーボー; イラスト; レトロ/ヴィンテージ; タイポグラフィ; その他
de: Kunststil: Art Deco; Jugendstil; Illustrativ; Retro/Vintage; Typografie; Sonstiges
nb: Kunststil: Art deco; Art nouveau; Illustrerende; Retro/vintage; Typografi; Annet
lt-LT: Meno stilius: Art deco; Art nouveau; Iliustracinis; Retro / Vintažas; Tipografija; Kita
ru: Художественный стиль: Ар-деко; Модерн; Иллюстративный; Ретро/винтаж; Типографика; Другой
sk-SK: Umelecký štýl: Art deco; Secesia; Ilustratívny; Retro/Vintage; Typografia; Iné
cs: Umělecký styl: Art deco; Secese; Ilustrativní; Retro/staré časy; Typografie; Jiné
ro-RO: Stil artistic: Art deco; Art Nouveau; Ilustrativ; Retro/Vintage; Tipografie; Altele
da: Kunststil: Art Deco; Art Nouveau; Illustrativ; Retro/vintage; Typografi; Andet
vi: Phong cách nghệ thuật: Trang trí nghệ thuật; Tân nghệ thuật; Minh họa; Phục cổ/Cổ điển; Nghệ thuật kiểu chữ; Khác
hu: Művészeti stílus: Art deco; Art nouveau; Illusztráció; Retró/vintage; Tipográfia; Egyéb
it: Stile artistico: Art Deco; Stile Liberty; Illustrativo; Retro/vintage; Tipografia; Altro